b2g/liblouis/jni/liblouis-c/tables/B2G-gr.ctb
# LibLouis table for Greek braille - Κώδικας Μπράιγ
# Author: Dave Mielke <dave@mielke.cc> [http://mielke.cc/]
# License: LGPL

##########
# Spaces #
##########

space	\s	0	space
space	\x00A0	0	non-trivial blank
space	\t	0	HT, CTRL-I
space	\v	0	VT, CTRL-V
space	\f	0	FF, CTRL-L
space	\r	0	CR, CTRL-M

##################
# Greek Alphabet #
##################

uplow	\x0391\x03B1	1	# Αα Alpha
uplow	\x0392\x03B2	12	# Ββ Beta
uplow	\x0393\x03B3	1245	# Γγ Gamma
uplow	\x0394\x03B4	145	# Δδ Delta
uplow	\x0395\x03B5	15	# Εε Epsilon
uplow	\x0396\x03B6	1356	# Ζζ Zeta
uplow	\x0397\x03B7	345	# Ηη Eta
uplow	\x0398\x03B8	1456	# Θθ Theta
uplow	\x0399\x03B9	24	# Ιι Iota
uplow	\x039A\x03BA	13	# Κκ Kappa
uplow	\x039B\x03BB	123	# Λλ Lambda
uplow	\x039C\x03BC	134	# Μμ Mu
uplow	\x039D\x03BD	1345	# Νν Nu
uplow	\x039E\x03BE	1346	# Ξξ Xi
uplow	\x039F\x03BF	135	# Οο Omicron
uplow	\x03A0\x03C0	1234	# Ππ Pi
uplow	\x03A1\x03C1	1235	# Ρρ Rho
lowercase	\x03C2	234	# ς Final Sigma
uplow	\x03A3\x03C3	234	# Σσ Sigma
uplow	\x03A4\x03C4	2345	# Ττ Tau
uplow	\x03A5\x03C5	13456	# Υυ Upsilon
uplow	\x03A6\x03C6	124	# Φφ Phi
uplow	\x03A7\x03C7	125	# Χχ Chi
uplow	\x03A8\x03C8	12346	# Ψψ Psi
uplow	\x03A9\x03C9	245	# Ωω Omega

#################
# Greek Accents #
#################

sign	\x1FEF	4	# ` Grave Accent (Varia)
sign	\x0384	5	# ΄ Acute Accent (Tonos)
sign	\x1FFD	5	# ´ Acute Accent (Oxia)
sign	\x1FC0	6	# ῀ Circumflex Accent (Perispomeni)
sign	\x1FBF	9	# ᾿ Smooth Breathing Accent (Psili)
sign	\x1FFE	1236	# ῾ Rough Breathing Accent (Dasia)
sign	\x037A	9	# ͺ Subscript Iota Accent (Ypogegrammeni)
sign	\x1FBE	9	# ι Adscript Iota Accent (Prosgegrammeni)
sign	\x00A8	9	# ¯ Diaeresis Accent (Dialytika)
sign	\x00AF	9	# ¯ Macron Accent
sign	\x02D8	9	# ¯ Breve Accent (Vrachy)

# ῍ Smooth and Grave Accent (Psili and Varia)
sign \x1FCD 23456
always \x1FBF\x1FEF 23456

# ῎ Smooth and Acute Accent (Psili and Oxia)
sign \x1FCE 356
always \x1FBF\x1FFD 356

# ῏ Smooth and Circumflex Accent (Psili and Perispomeni)
sign \x1FCF 256
always \x1FBF\x1FC0 256

# ῝ Rough and Grave Accent (Dasia and Varia)
sign \x1FDD 12356
always \x1FFE\x1FEF 12356

# ῞ Rough and Acute Accent (Dasia and Oxia)
sign \x1FDE 26
always \x1FFE\x1FFD 26

# ῟ Rough and Circumflex Accent (Dasia and Perispomeni)
sign \x1FDF 235
always \x1FFE\x1FC0 235

lowercase	\x1FB3	35	# ᾳ Alpha with Iota Subscript (Alpha with Ypogegrammeni)
lowercase	\x1FC3	3456	# ῃ Eta with Iota Subscript (Eta with Ypogegrammeni)
lowercase	\x1FF3	2456	# ῳ Omega with Iota Subscript (Omega with Ypogegrammeni)

###############
# Punctuation #
###############

# Hyphen
sign	-	36
hyphen	-	36

punctuation	\x002C	2	# , Comma
punctuation	\x0387	23	# · Greek Semicolon
punctuation	\x003A	25	# : Colon
punctuation	\x002E	256	# . Period
punctuation	\x0021	235	# ! Exclamation Mark
punctuation	\x037E	26	# ; Greek Question Mark
punctuation	\x003F	236	# ? English Question Mark
punctuation	\x2026	3-3-3	# … Horizontal Ellipsis
punctuation	\x2015	6-36	# ― Dialog (Horizontal) Bar
punctuation	\x2019	3	# ’ Apostrophe (Right Single Quotation Mark)

#########
# Signs #
#########

sign	*	35-35	# Asterisk
sign	/	34	# Slash
sign	_	456	# Underline
sign	@	4-1	# At Sign
sign	%	4-356	# Percent Sign
sign	€	4-15	# Euro Sign
sign	$	4-234	# Dollar Sign

################
# Math Symbols #
################

math	+	346	# Addition

math	\x2212	36	# Subtraction
endnum	-	36	# Subtraction

math	\x00D7	46-16	# Multiplication
endnum	*	46-16	# Multiplication

math	\x00F7	46-34	# Division
endnum	/	46-34	# Division

math	=	46-13	# Equals
math	<	5-13	# Less Than
math	>	46-2	# Greater Than

#################
# Braille Cells #
#################

include braille-patterns.cti

###########
# Numbers #
###########

include digits6Dots.uti
midnum	,	2	# Decimal Point
midnum	.	46	# Digit Grouping

###################
# Enclosing Signs #
###################

# « Greek Opening Quotation Mark (Left-Pointing Double Angle Quotation Mark)
punctuation \x00AB 23678
prepunc     \x00AB 236

# » Greek Closing Quotation Mark (Right-Pointing Double Angle Quotation Mark)
punctuation \x00BB 35678
postpunc    \x00BB 356

# "" English Quotation Marks
punctuation " 235678
prepunc     " 126
postpunc    " 345

# ( Opening Parenthesis
punctuation ( 23678
prepunc     ( 2356

# ) Closing Parenthesis
punctuation ) 35678
postpunc    ) 2356

# [ Opening Bracket
punctuation [ 1235678
prepunc     [ 12356

# ] Closing Bracket
punctuation ] 2345678
postpunc    ] 23456

# { Opening Brace
punctuation { 1234678
prepunc     { 12346

# } Closing Brace
punctuation } 1345678
postpunc    } 13456

####################
# Greek Diphthongs #
####################

always \x03B1\x03B9	126	# αι Alpha Iota
always \x03B1\x03C5	16	# αυ Alpha Upsilon
always \x03B5\x03B9	146	# ει Epsilon Iota
always \x03B5\x03C5	156	# ευ Epsilon Upsilon
always \x03B7\x03C5	1256	# ηυ Eta Upsilon
always \x03BF\x03B9	246	# οι Omicron Iota
always \X03BF\x03C5	136	# ου Omicron Upsilon
always \x03C5\x03B9	12456	# υι Upsilon Iota

# The Tonos accent, if present, is always on the second letter.
always \x03B1\x0384\x03B9	5-126	# αί Alpha Iota
always \x03B1\x0384\x03C5	5-16	# αύ Alpha Upsilon
always \x03B5\x0384\x03B9	5-146	# εί Epsilon Iota
always \x03B5\x0384\x03C5	5-156	# εύ Epsilon Upsilon
always \x03B7\x0384\x03C5	5-1256	# ηύ Eta Upsilon
always \x03BF\x0384\x03B9	5-246	# οί Omicron Iota
always \X03BF\x0384\x03C5	5-136	# ού Omicron Upsilon
always \x03C5\x0384\x03B9	5-12456	# υί Upsilon Iota

# The Oxia accent, if present, is always on the second letter.
always \x03B1\x1FFD\x03B9	5-126	# αί Alpha Iota
always \x03B1\x1FFD\x03C5	5-16	# αύ Alpha Upsilon
always \x03B5\x1FFD\x03B9	5-146	# εί Epsilon Iota
always \x03B5\x1FFD\x03C5	5-156	# εύ Epsilon Upsilon
always \x03B7\x1FFD\x03C5	5-1256	# ηύ Eta Upsilon
always \x03BF\x1FFD\x03B9	5-246	# οί Omicron Iota
always \X03BF\x1FFD\x03C5	5-136	# ού Omicron Upsilon
always \x03C5\x1FFD\x03B9	5-12456	# υί Upsilon Iota

##############
# Indicators #
##############

capsign	46
numsign 3456

##########################
# Greek Accented Letters #
##########################

# Capital Alpha with Tonos
uppercase \x0386 1
correct "\x0386" "\x0384\x0391"

# Capital Epsilon with Tonos
uppercase \x0388 15
correct "\x0388" "\x0384\x0395"

# Capital Eta with Tonos
uppercase \x0389 345
correct "\x0389" "\x0384\x0397"

# Capital Iota with Tonos
uppercase \x038A 24
correct "\x038A" "\x0384\x0399"

# Capital Omicron with Tonos
uppercase \x038C 135
correct "\x038C" "\x0384\x039F"

# Capital Upsilon with Tonos
uppercase \x038E 13456
correct "\x038E" "\x0384\x03A5"

# Capital Omega with Tonos
uppercase \x038F 245
correct "\x038F" "\x0384\x03A9"

# Small Iota with Dialytika and Tonos
lowercase \x0390 24
correct "\x0390" "\x00A8\x0384\x03B9"

# Capital Iota with Dialytika
uppercase \x03AA 24
correct "\x03AA" "\x00A8\x0399"

# Capital Upsilon with Dialytika
uppercase \x03AB 13456
correct "\x03AB" "\x00A8\x03A5"

# Small Alpha with Tonos
lowercase \x03AC 1
correct "\x03AC" "\x0384\x03B1"

# Small Epsilon with Tonos
lowercase \x03AD 15
correct "\x03AD" "\x0384\x03B5"

# Small Eta with Tonos
lowercase \x03AE 345
correct "\x03AE" "\x0384\x03B7"

# Small Iota with Tonos
lowercase \x03AF 24
correct "\x03AF" "\x0384\x03B9"

# Small Upsilon with Dialytika and Tonos
lowercase \x03B0 13456
correct "\x03B0" "\x00A8\x0384\x03C5"

# Small Iota with Dialytika
lowercase \x03CA 24
correct "\x03CA" "\x00A8\x03B9"

# Small Upsilon with Dialytika
lowercase \x03CB 13456
correct "\x03CB" "\x00A8\x03C5"

# Small Omicron with Tonos
lowercase \x03CC 135
correct "\x03CC" "\x0384\x03BF"

# Small Upsilon with Tonos
lowercase \x03CD 13456
correct "\x03CD" "\x0384\x03C5"

# Small Omega with Tonos
lowercase \x03CE 245
correct "\x03CE" "\x0384\x03C9"

# Small Alpha with Psili
lowercase \x1F00 1
correct "\x1F00" "\x1FBF\x03B1"

# Small Alpha with Dasia
lowercase \x1F01 1
correct "\x1F01" "\x1FFE\x03B1"

# Small Alpha with Psili and Varia
lowercase \x1F02 1
correct "\x1F02" "\x1FBF\x1FEF\x03B1"

# Small Alpha with Dasia and Varia
lowercase \x1F03 1
correct "\x1F03" "\x1FFE\x1FEF\x03B1"

# Small Alpha with Psili and Oxia
lowercase \x1F04 1
correct "\x1F04" "\x1FBF\x1FFD\x03B1"

# Small Alpha with Dasia and Oxia
lowercase \x1F05 1
correct "\x1F05" "\x1FFE\x1FFD\x03B1"

# Small Alpha with Psili and Perispomeni
lowercase \x1F06 1
correct "\x1F06" "\x1FBF\x1FC0\x03B1"

# Small Alpha with Dasia and Perispomeni
lowercase \x1F07 1
correct "\x1F07" "\x1FFE\x1FC0\x03B1"

# Capital Alpha with Psili
uppercase \x1F08 1
correct "\x1F08" "\x1FBF\x0391"

# Capital Alpha with Dasia
uppercase \x1F09 1
correct "\x1F09" "\x1FFE\x0391"

# Capital Alpha with Psili and Varia
uppercase \x1F0A 1
correct "\x1F0A" "\x1FBF\x1FEF\x0391"

# Capital Alpha with Dasia and Varia
uppercase \x1F0B 1
correct "\x1F0B" "\x1FFE\x1FEF\x0391"

# Capital Alpha with Psili and Oxia
uppercase \x1F0C 1
correct "\x1F0C" "\x1FBF\x1FFD\x0391"

# Capital Alpha with Dasia and Oxia
uppercase \x1F0D 1
correct "\x1F0D" "\x1FFE\x1FFD\x0391"

# Capital Alpha with Psili and Perispomeni
uppercase \x1F0E 1
correct "\x1F0E" "\x1FBF\x1FC0\x0391"

# Capital Alpha with Dasia and Perispomeni
uppercase \x1F0F 1
correct "\x1F0F" "\x1FFE\x1FC0\x0391"

# Small Epsilon with Psili
lowercase \x1F10 15
correct "\x1F10" "\x1FBF\x03B5"

# Small Epsilon with Dasia
lowercase \x1F11 15
correct "\x1F11" "\x1FFE\x03B5"

# Small Epsilon with Psili and Varia
lowercase \x1F12 15
correct "\x1F12" "\x1FBF\x1FEF\x03B5"

# Small Epsilon with Dasia and Varia
lowercase \x1F13 15
correct "\x1F13" "\x1FFE\x1FEF\x03B5"

# Small Epsilon with Psili and Oxia
lowercase \x1F14 15
correct "\x1F14" "\x1FBF\x1FFD\x03B5"

# Small Epsilon with Dasia and Oxia
lowercase \x1F15 15
correct "\x1F15" "\x1FFE\x1FFD\x03B5"

# Capital Epsilon with Psili
uppercase \x1F18 15
correct "\x1F18" "\x1FBF\x0395"

# Capital Epsilon with Dasia
uppercase \x1F19 15
correct "\x1F19" "\x1FFE\x0395"

# Capital Epsilon with Psili and Varia
uppercase \x1F1A 15
correct "\x1F1A" "\x1FBF\x1FEF\x0395"

# Capital Epsilon with Dasia and Varia
uppercase \x1F1B 15
correct "\x1F1B" "\x1FFE\x1FEF\x0395"

# Capital Epsilon with Psili and Oxia
uppercase \x1F1C 15
correct "\x1F1C" "\x1FBF\x1FFD\x0395"

# Capital Epsilon with Dasia and Oxia
uppercase \x1F1D 15
correct "\x1F1D" "\x1FFE\x1FFD\x0395"

# Small Eta with Psili
lowercase \x1F20 345
correct "\x1F20" "\x1FBF\x03B7"

# Small Eta with Dasia
lowercase \x1F21 345
correct "\x1F21" "\x1FFE\x03B7"

# Small Eta with Psili and Varia
lowercase \x1F22 345
correct "\x1F22" "\x1FBF\x1FEF\x03B7"

# Small Eta with Dasia and Varia
lowercase \x1F23 345
correct "\x1F23" "\x1FFE\x1FEF\x03B7"

# Small Eta with Psili and Oxia
lowercase \x1F24 345
correct "\x1F24" "\x1FBF\x1FFD\x03B7"

# Small Eta with Dasia and Oxia
lowercase \x1F25 345
correct "\x1F25" "\x1FFE\x1FFD\x03B7"

# Small Eta with Psili and Perispomeni
lowercase \x1F26 345
correct "\x1F26" "\x1FBF\x1FC0\x03B7"

# Small Eta with Dasia and Perispomeni
lowercase \x1F27 345
correct "\x1F27" "\x1FFE\x1FC0\x03B7"

# Capital Eta with Psili
uppercase \x1F28 345
correct "\x1F28" "\x1FBF\x0397"

# Capital Eta with Dasia
uppercase \x1F29 345
correct "\x1F29" "\x1FFE\x0397"

# Capital Eta with Psili and Varia
uppercase \x1F2A 345
correct "\x1F2A" "\x1FBF\x1FEF\x0397"

# Capital Eta with Dasia and Varia
uppercase \x1F2B 345
correct "\x1F2B" "\x1FFE\x1FEF\x0397"

# Capital Eta with Psili and Oxia
uppercase \x1F2C 345
correct "\x1F2C" "\x1FBF\x1FFD\x0397"

# Capital Eta with Dasia and Oxia
uppercase \x1F2D 345
correct "\x1F2D" "\x1FFE\x1FFD\x0397"

# Capital Eta with Psili and Perispomeni
uppercase \x1F2E 345
correct "\x1F2E" "\x1FBF\x1FC0\x0397"

# Capital Eta with Dasia and Perispomeni
uppercase \x1F2F 345
correct "\x1F2F" "\x1FFE\x1FC0\x0397"

# Small Iota with Psili
lowercase \x1F30 24
correct "\x1F30" "\x1FBF\x03B9"

# Small Iota with Dasia
lowercase \x1F31 24
correct "\x1F31" "\x1FFE\x03B9"

# Small Iota with Psili and Varia
lowercase \x1F32 24
correct "\x1F32" "\x1FBF\x1FEF\x03B9"
